Utah statutes.
59-7-701.   Taxation of S corporations -- Revenue and Taxation Interim
Committee study.
(1)  Except as provided in Section 59-7-102 and subject to the other
provisions of this part, beginning on July 1, 1994, and ending on the last day
of the taxable year that begins on or after January 1, 2012, but begins on or
before December 31, 2012, an S corporation is subject to taxation in the same
manner as that S corporation is taxed under Subchapter S - Tax Treatment of S
Corporations and Their Shareholders, Sec. 1361 et seq., Internal Revenue Code.
(2)  An S corporation is taxed at the tax rate provided in Section 59-7-104.
(3)  The business income and nonbusiness income of an S corporation is subject
to Part 3, Allocation and Apportionment of Income - Utah UDITPA Provisions.
(4)  An S corporation having income derived from or connected with Utah
sources shall make a return in accordance with Section 59-10-507.
(5)  An S corporation shall make payments of estimated tax as required by
Section 59-7-504.
(6)  An S corporation is subject to Chapter 10, Part 14, Pass-Through Entities
and Pass-Through Entity Taxpayers Act.
(7)  A pass-through entity taxpayer as defined in Section 59-10-1402 of an S
corporation is subject to Chapter 10, Part 14, Pass-Through Entities and Pass-
Through Entity Taxpayers Act.
(8)  Provisions under this chapter governing the following apply to an S
corporation:
(a)  an assessment;
(b)  a penalty;
(c)  a refund; or
(d)  a record required for an S corporation.
(9) (a)  During the 2011 interim, the Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee
shall study the fiscal impacts of:
(i)  the enactment of Laws of Utah 2009, Chapter 312; and
(ii)  the taxation of S corporations under this part.
(b)  On or before November 30, 2011, the Revenue and Taxation Interim
Committee shall report its findings and recommendations on the study to the
Executive Appropriations Committee.
